Vermont, session 2025-2026, H111.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 376(c) is amended to read:
(c)(1) The registration fee for registration of a motor truck, trailer,
ambulance, or other motor vehicle, owned by a volunteer fire department or
other volunteer firefighting organization or other organization conducting
rescue operations and used solely for fire fighting firefighting or rescue
purposes shall be $15.00 in lieu of fees otherwise specified in this chapter. A
VT LEG #380054 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.111
2025 Page 2 of 2
motor vehicle or trailer registered under this section shall be plainly marked on
both sides of the body or cab to indicate its ownership.
(2) The registration fee for registration of a motor vehicle owned or
leased by a volunteer firefighter and issued a permit for sirens and red or red
and white signal lamps pursuant to subdivision 1252(b)(2)(A) of this title shall
be $0.00 in lieu of fees otherwise specified in this chapter.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380054 v.1